Illinois, session 104th, SB1173.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Notary Public Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3-104 and 6-104 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 312/3-104)  (from Ch. 102, par. 203-104)7    Sec. 3-104. Maximum fee. 8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (a), 9the maximum fee for non-electronic notarization in this State 10is $5 for any notarial act performed and up to $25 for any 11notarial act performed pursuant to Section 3-102.12    Fees for a notary public, agency, or any other person who 13is not an attorney or an accredited representative filling out 14immigration forms shall be limited to the following:15        (1) $10 per form completion;16        (2) $10 per page for the translation of a non-English 17    language into English where such translation is required 18    for immigration forms;19        (3) $5 for notarizing;20        (4) $3 to execute any procedures necessary to obtain a 21    document required to complete immigration forms; and22        (5) A maximum of $75 for one complete application.23    Fees authorized under this subsection shall not include   SB1173 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1application fees required to be submitted with immigration 2applications.3    (b) The maximum fee in this State up to $25 for any 4electronic notarial act performed pursuant to this Act. An 5electronic notary public may charge a reasonable fee to 6recover any cost of providing a copy of an entry or a recording 7of an audio-video communication in an electronic journal 8maintained pursuant to Section 3-107. 9    (c) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 10(a) or (b) shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a first 11offense and a Class 3 felony for a second or subsequent offense 12committed within 5 years of a previous conviction for the same 13offense.14    (d) Upon his own information or upon complaint of any 15person, the Attorney General or any State's Attorney, or their 16designee, may maintain an action for injunctive relief in the 17court against any notary public or any other person who 18violates the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this 19Section. These remedies are in addition to, and not in 20substitution for, other available remedies.21    If the Attorney General or any State's Attorney fails to 22bring an action as provided pursuant to this subsection within 2390 days of receipt of a complaint, any person may file a civil 24action to enforce the provisions of this subsection and 25maintain an action for injunctive relief.26    (e) All notaries public must provide itemized receipts and   SB1173 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1keep records for fees accepted for services provided. Notarial 2fees must appear on the itemized receipt as separate and 3distinct from any other charges assessed. Failure to provide 4itemized receipts and keep records that can be presented as 5evidence of no wrongdoing shall be construed as a presumptive 6admission of allegations raised in complaints against the 7notary for violations related to accepting prohibited fees. 8    (f) No fee shall be charged for any notarial act related to 9the execution of an Illinois Secretary of State Department of 10Driver Services Homeless Status Certification form. 11(Source: P.A. 102-160, eff. 5-6-23 (See Section 91 of P.A. 12103-562 for effective date of P.A. 102-160).) 13    (5 ILCS 312/6-104)  (from Ch. 102, par. 206-104)14    Sec. 6-104. Acts prohibited. 15    (a) A notary public shall not use any name or initial in 16signing certificates other than that by which the notary was 17commissioned.18    (b) A notary public shall not acknowledge any instrument 19in which the notary's name appears as a party to the 20transaction.21    (c) A notary public shall not affix his signature to a 22blank form of affidavit or certificate of acknowledgment.23    (d) A notary public shall not take the acknowledgment of 24or administer an oath to any person whom the notary actually 25knows to have been adjudged mentally ill by a court of   SB1173 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1competent jurisdiction and who has not been restored to mental 2health as a matter of record.3    (e) A notary public shall not take the acknowledgment of 4any person who is blind until the notary has read the 5instrument to such person.6    (f) A notary public shall not take the acknowledgment of 7any person who does not speak or understand the English 8language, unless the nature and effect of the instrument to be 9notarized is translated into a language which the person does 10understand.11    (g) A notary public shall not change anything in a written 12instrument after it has been signed by anyone.13    (h) No notary public shall be authorized to prepare any 14legal instrument, or fill in the blanks of an instrument, 15other than a notary certificate; however, this prohibition 16shall not prohibit an attorney, who is also a notary public, 17from performing notarial acts for any document prepared by 18that attorney.19    (i) If a notary public accepts or receives any money from 20any one to whom an oath has been administered or on behalf of 21whom an acknowledgment has been taken for the purpose of 22transmitting or forwarding such money to another and willfully 23fails to transmit or forward such money promptly, the notary 24is personally liable for any loss sustained because of such 25failure. The person or persons damaged by such failure may 26bring an action to recover damages, together with interest and   SB1173 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1reasonable attorney fees, against such notary public or his 2bondsmen.3    (j) A notary public shall not perform any notarial act 4when his or her commission is suspended or revoked, nor shall 5he or she fail to comply with any term of suspension which may 6be imposed for violation of this Section. 7    (k) No notary public shall be authorized to explain, 8certify, or verify the contents of any document; however, this 9prohibition shall not prohibit an attorney, who is also a 10notary public, from performing notarial acts for any document 11prepared by that attorney.12    (l) A notary public shall not represent himself or herself 13as an electronic notary public if the person has not been 14commissioned as an electronic notary public by the Secretary 15of State.16    (m) No person shall knowingly create, manufacture, or 17distribute software or hardware for the purpose of allowing a 18person to act as an electronic notary public without being 19commissioned in accordance with this Act. A violation of this 20subsection (m) is a Class A misdemeanor.21    (n) No person shall wrongfully obtain, conceal, damage, or 22destroy the technology or device used to create the electronic 23signature or seal of an electronic notary public. A violation 24of this subsection (n) is a Class A misdemeanor.25    (o) A notary public shall not sell, rent, transfer, or 26otherwise make available to a third party, other than the   SB1173 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1electronic notarization platform, the contents of the notarial 2journal, audio-video recordings, or any other record 3associated with any notarial act, including personally 4identifiable information, except when required by law, law 5enforcement, the Secretary of State, or a court order. Upon 6written request of a third party, which request must include 7the name of the parties, the type of document, and the month 8and year in which a record was notarized, a notary public may 9supply a copy of the line item representing the requested 10transaction after personally identifying information has been 11redacted.12    (p) The Secretary of State may suspend the commission of a 13notary or electronic notary who fails to produce any journal 14entry within 10 days after receipt of a request from the 15Secretary of State.16    (q) Upon surrender, revocation, or expiration of a 17commission as a notary or electronic notary, all notarial 18records or electronic notarial records required under this 19Section, except as otherwise provided by law, must be kept by 20the notary public or electronic notary for a period of 5 years 21after the termination of the registration of the notary public 22or electronic notary public. 23    (r) A notary public shall not charge a fee for any notarial 24act related to the execution of an Illinois Secretary of State 25Department of Driver Services Homeless Status Certification 26form.   SB1173 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09910 SPS 19980 b1(Source: P.A. 102-160, eff. 6-5-23 (See Section 91 of P.A. 2102-562 for effective date of P.A. 102-160).)